Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2493.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 204 of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended by adding a clause to read:Section 204. Exclusions from Tax.--The tax imposed by section 202 shall not be imposed upon any of the following:* * *(77) The sale at retail to, or use by, an individual of a child passenger restraint system, formula feeding supplies or teethers for the individual's first child. The department shall 12345678910111213141516171819202122 publish guidance on its publicly accessible Internet website on the implementation of the exclusion under this clause. For the purposes of this clause, the following words and phrases shall have the following meanings:"Child passenger restraint system" means a device, except a seat belt, designed for use in a motor vehicle or aircraft to restrain, seat or position a child who weighs not more than 80 pounds."Formula feeding supplies" means tangible personal property manufactured for the purpose of initiating, supporting or sustaining formula feeding."Individual's first child" means the oldest child or only child of an individual at the time of the sale or use. The term includes a child adopted by the individual."Teethers" means tangible personal property designed for babies to bite or chew to assist in relieving pain or discomfort during teething.Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026, or immediately, whichever is later.20260HB2493PN3377 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819